Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.209

Identity information.

(1) "Identity information" means information that identifies an individual, or may be used to determine the identity of an individual, including:

(a) Federal tax identification number or employer identification number;

(b) Residential and mailing address, but not the five-digit zip code;

(c) Email address;

(d) Telephone number;

(e) Registered and legal vehicle owner name;

(f) Gender;

(g) Place of birth;

(h) Voter information status; and

(i) Selective service information.

(2) "Personal information" has the same meaning as in RCW 42.56.590.

[ 2021 c 93 s 2.]